Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1090HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 178 Section 1. Section 805.8A, subsection 5, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (5) One Two hundred thirty-five eighty-five dollars plus 3 five dollars for each mile per hour of excessive speed over 4 twenty miles per hour over the limit. 5